Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.365

Child abuse and neglect—Development of curriculum.

(1) The commission, in consultation with the department of social and health services, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, shall develop a curriculum related to child abuse and neglect to be included in the basic law enforcement training that must be successfully completed within the first fifteen months of employment of all law enforcement personnel.

(2) The curriculum must be incorporated into the basic law enforcement training program by July 1, 2008.

[ 2007 c 410 s 4.]

NOTES:

Short title—2007 c 410: See note following RCW 13.34.138.